Vermont statutes. Title 6 Agriculture
Chapter 67. Public Warehouses that Store Farm Products

§ 891.
License.

Excepting frozen food locker plants, any person, as defined in 9A V.S.A. §§ 1-201 and 7-102, who stores milk, cream, butter, cheese, eggs, meat, poultry, and fruit for hire in quantities of 1,000 pounds or more of any commodity shall first be licensed by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets. Each separate place of business shall be licensed.

HISTORY:

Amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2013, No. 83

, § 5, eff. June 10, 2013.

§ 892.
Requirements.

Before licensing such places, the Secretary shall satisfy himself or herself as to the condition of the building, sanitation, refrigeration, and the general safety of the goods stored therein under regulations and requirements which he or she may deem proper.

HISTORY:

Amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003.

§ 893.
Application forms; fee.

The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall furnish necessary application forms. The annual license date shall be April 1. The annual license fee shall be $125.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

1975, No. 220

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

1989, No. 257

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2015, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 10.